Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB594.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 17.500 TO 17.580 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Costume" means an outfit, including a mask or makeup, worn to create
the appearance or characteristic of a particular period, person, character,
animal, place, or thing; and
(b) "Halloween-related activity" means an activity involving minors organized
around and concerning the celebration of Halloween that occurs any time
during the fourteen (14) days before or after October 31 of each year,
including but not limited to:
1. Trick-or-treating;
2. A costume party where minors are in attendance; or
3. Any event involving the distribution of candy to minors.
(2) A registrant who has committed a criminal offense against a victim who is a
minor shall not participate in any Halloween-related activity.
(3) This section shall not apply to:
(a) The distribution of candy to a minor by the minor's parent or guardian;
(b) A registrant's attendance at a costume party with minors in attendance if
the registrant is the parent or guardian of all minors in attendance; or
(c) Wearing a costume for a legitimate work-related event or purpose during
normal business hours.
(4) Any person who violates subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class D felony for a second or
subsequent offense.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/8/2025 11:48 AM Jacketed